California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(m) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing no sooner than July 1, 2021, the department, in consultation with representatives of county welfare departments, the Statewide Automated Welfare System and other interested stakeholders, shall initiate the planning process to prioritize the automation of Medi-Cal suspensions for incarcerated individuals into the California Healthcare Eligibility, Enrollment, and Retention System, as set forth in this section. This change shall be reflected in both the California Healthcare Eligibility, Enrollment, and Retention System 24-Month Roadmap Initiatives and the County Eligibility Worker Dashboard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 85.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14011.15.

(a) The department shall, not later than July 1, 2000, create and implement a simplified application package for children, families, and adults applying for Medi-Cal benefits. This simplified application package shall include a simplified supplemental resource form.

(b) In developing the application package described in subdivision (a), the department shall seek input from persons with expertise, including beneficiary representatives, counties, and beneficiaries.

(c) The department shall allow an applicant to apply for benefits by mailing in the simplified application package.

(d) The simplified application package shall utilize at a minimum, all of the following documentation standards:

(1) Proof of income shall be documented by the most recent paystub or a copy of the last year’s federal income tax return.

(2) Self-declaration of pregnancy.

(3) A simplified supplemental resource form, if applicable.

(e) The department shall not require an applicant who submits a simplified application pursuant to this section to complete a face-to-face interview, except for good cause, a suspicion of
 fraud, or in order to complete the application process. A county shall conduct random monitoring of the mail-in application process to ensure appropriate enrollment. Every application package shall contain a notification of the applicant’s right to complete a face-to-face interview.

(f) The department shall implement this section only to the extent that its provisions are not in violation of the requirements of federal law, and only to the extent that federal financial participation is available.

(g) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement this section by means of all county letters or similar instructions without taking regulatory action. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340)
 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 9, Sec. 5.   Effective May 5, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14011.2.

(a) The department shall require that each applicant for or beneficiary of Medi-Cal, including a child, who is not a recipient of aid under the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) shall provide their social security account number, or numbers, if they have more than one such number.

(b) The requirement for a social security account number shall be a condition of eligibility only for the applicant who is seeking or the beneficiary who is receiving (1) full-scope medical benefits or (2), pursuant to Section 14007.5, restricted medical benefits (emergency and pregnancy-related services only), and, in either case, who
 declares, as required in subdivision (d), that they are a citizen or national of the United States, and, if they are not a citizen or national of the United States, that they have satisfactory immigration status.

(c) The requirement for a social security account number shall not be a condition of eligibility for the applicant who is seeking or the beneficiary who is receiving, pursuant to Section 14007.5, restricted medical benefits (emergency and pregnancy-related services only), and who has not made the declaration, as required in subdivision (d), that they are not a citizen or national of the United States, and, if they are not a citizen or national of the United States, that they do not have satisfactory immigration status.

(d) Every applicant or beneficiary or, in the case of a
 child, by the child’s caretaker relative or legal guardian on their behalf shall declare, under penalty of perjury, that they are, or are not, any of the following:

(1) A citizen of the United States.

(2) A national of the United States.

(3) A person who has satisfactory immigration status.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding Section 50301.1 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, an individual who declares to be a citizen or national of the United States in accordance with Section 1903(i)(22) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396b(i)(22)) shall present satisfactory documentary evidence of citizenship or nationality in
 compliance with Section 1903(x) (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396b(x) of the federal Social Security Act). Except as otherwise provided in Section 14007.2 and in paragraph (7), no services shall be available under this chapter for an individual who fails to comply with the documentation requirements of this section.

(2) (A) The documentation required pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be provided once by each individual, as follows:

(i) During the initial application process for applicants.

(ii) During the redetermination process for existing beneficiaries.

(B) If the documentation is obtained from a beneficiary, the county shall maintain a copy of the documentation in
 the case file of the beneficiary, and shall not request this documentation again.

(C) If electronic verification is used, a record of the documentation shall be maintained in the case record and shall not be requested again.

(D) Once the required documentation has been obtained by the county, the beneficiary shall not be required to provide it again, even if they are transferring to or applying in a new county.

(3) To the extent that federal financial participation is available, the department shall provide for exceptions or alternatives to the documentation requirements imposed by this subdivision as a means of providing individuals with increased flexibility and ability to provide satisfactory documentary evidence within
 a reasonable period of time. These exceptions or alternatives may include, but shall not be limited to, using an expanded list of acceptable documents, relying on electronic data matches for birth certificates, relying on a sworn affidavit of citizenship with respect to an individual who can demonstrate good cause for their inability or other failure to provide the required documentation, and relying on other information that may be available electronically.

(4) (A) To the extent that federal financial participation is available, the department shall rely on the eligibility determinations for the CalWORKs program or the Aid to Families with Dependent Children-Foster Care program as meeting the requirements of this section.

(B) To the extent that federal
 financial participation is available, an individual shall be deemed to have met the documentation requirements of this subdivision if the individual has been determined to be eligible for supplemental security income pursuant to Title XVI of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.).

(5) The following provisions shall apply to the extent that federal financial participation is available:

(A) If an individual cooperates in the effort to obtain and present the documentation required under this subdivision, the individual shall be given as much time as is allowed by federal law and policy to present that documentation.

(B) During the time period described in subparagraph (A), an applicant shall receive
 the scope of Medi-Cal benefits for which the applicant is otherwise eligible.

(6) To the extent that federal financial participation is available, the county shall do all of the following to assist an individual in obtaining and presenting the documentation required under this subdivision:

(A) For an applicant who does not present the required documentation at the time of application, the county, during the time period described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5), shall assist the applicant in obtaining that documentation.

(B) For a current beneficiary who has not yet documented their citizenship, the county shall do the following:

(i) If, at the time of
 annual redetermination, the beneficiary returns the annual redetermination form and, but for the failure to present the required documentation, continued eligibility could be established, the county shall do the following:

(I) Review county eligibility files and records, and the Medi-Cal Eligibility Data System, to access those documents. This review shall include a review of any CalWORKs or CalFresh files that may exist for the beneficiary.

(II) Attempt to reach the beneficiary by telephone to advise the beneficiary as to the need to obtain and present the required documentation.

(III) If the beneficiary fails to respond to the telephone contact or present the required documents, send a second form to the beneficiary
 that highlights the documentation being requested and informs the beneficiary to contact the county. The form shall be written in a simple, clear, consumer-friendly manner, and shall explain why the documentation is necessary.

(IV) If the beneficiary fails to contact the county, the county shall make another attempt to reach the beneficiary by telephone to advise the beneficiary of the need to obtain and present the required documentation.

(ii) Document in the case file any efforts made to contact and advise the beneficiary as to the need to obtain and present the required documentation.

(C) If a beneficiary fails to present the required documentation after the process required under clause (i), the county shall send a
 10-day notice of action to indicate that the beneficiary’s benefits are reduced to those made available under Section 14007.2.

(7) To the extent federal financial participation is available, and only to the extent any necessary federal approvals have been obtained, the department may, in its discretion, elect the option referenced in Section 1396a(a)(46)(B)(ii) of Title 42 of the United States Code to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (1). This paragraph shall become operative on January 1, 2010, or when all necessary agreements with the Commissioner of Social Security are in place, whichever is later. The department may implement this paragraph earlier than January 1, 2010, only to the extent allowed by federal law or guidance.

(8) (A) Any benefits
 provided in accordance with subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) shall terminate if any of the following occurs:

(i) The individual does not obtain and present the required documentation within the time period provided in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5).

(ii) The documentation is received by the county and the county has made a final determination of eligibility.

(B) The termination of Medi-Cal benefits under this paragraph shall occur without the necessity of further review or determination by the department. This shall not affect an individual’s right to a hearing with respect to the denial of the application or termination of eligibility resulting from the annual eligibility redetermination.

(9) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement this subdivision by means of an all-county letter or similar instruction without taking regulatory action. Within three years from the date that this subdivision becomes effective, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(10) The department shall notify and consult with advocates, providers, counties, and health plans in implementing, interpreting, or making specific this subdivision.

(11) The department shall file all
 necessary state plan amendments to implement the requirements of this subdivision. Upon filing any state plan amendment, the department shall provide the appropriate fiscal committees of the Legislature with a copy of the state plan amendment.

(12) If any part of this subdivision is in conflict with or does not comply with federal law, the subdivision shall be implemented only to the extent that federal law permits. Any part that is in conflict with or does not comply with federal law shall be severable from the remaining portions of this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 76.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14011.25.

To the extent federal financial participation is available, the department shall take all steps necessary to comply with the terms and conditions of the State Child Health Insurance Program waiver described in Section 12693.755 of the Insurance Code extending eligibility under the Healthy Families Program to parents and certain other adults. The department shall seek any state plan amendments or other waivers under Title XIX of the Social
 Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) necessary to implement this section.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 14011.2 (as added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 171, Sec. 34) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 603.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

14011.3.

(a) To the same extent as required by federal law, a person who is not a citizen or national of the United States whose entry into the United States has been sponsored by an individual who, or organization that, executed an affidavit of support or similar agreement with respect to the person shall be ineligible for the Medi-Cal program for a period of five years after the person’s entry into the United States unless the sponsoring person dies or the sponsoring organization ceases to exist.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply with respect to any person who is not a citizen or national of the United States who is:

(1) Admitted to the United States as a result of the application, prior to April 1, 1980, of Section 1153(a)(7) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(2) Admitted to the United States as a result of the application, after March 31, 1980, of Section 1157(c) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(3) Paroled into the United States under Section 1182(d)(5) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(4) Granted political asylum by the United States Attorney General under Section 1158 of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(5) A Cuban or Haitian entrant, as defined in Section 501(e) of the Refugee Education Assistance Act of 1980 (Public Law 96-422).

(c) This section shall become operative on the effective date of federal law that prohibits providing Medi-Cal assistance to a sponsored person, as defined in subdivision (a), and shall remain operative only as long as federal law remains in effect. The director shall determine the operative dates of this section pursuant to this subdivision and shall execute a declaration, that shall be retained by the director, that sets forth the operative date or termination date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 77.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operation (or resumed operation) of this section is subject to conditions prescribed in subd. (c).    After initial operation, this section may become inoperative as provided in subd. (c).)
-------------------------------------------

14011.4.

The department shall, subject to the requirements of federal law, and not later than six months after the effective date of this section, develop a simple referral form to be used as proof of birth, in order to initiate Medi-Cal enrollment and the establishment of benefits for newborns who are eligible for one year of automatic continuous Medi-Cal eligible benefits pursuant to Section 1902(e)(4) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(e)(4)). In developing the referral form, the department shall seek input from beneficiary representatives and
 health care providers serving pregnant women receiving, or eligible for, Medi-Cal benefits. The infant’s parent or guardian, or, with the knowledge and written consent of the infant’s parent or guardian, a health care provider or other hospital worker, may submit the referral form by mail or facsimile. Upon receipt of the form, the department shall, subject to the requirements of federal law, assign a Medi-Cal number to the newborn and issue a Medi-Cal card.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 294, Sec. 58.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14011.5.

The department shall be responsible for establishing the necessary systems for the identification, review and approval, disbursement, and reimbursement systems for those health services provided to the medically indigent population eligible for federal reimbursement under the Refugee/Cuban Haitian Entrant Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1594, Sec. 27.   Effective September 30, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

14011.6.

(a) To the extent federal financial participation is available, the department shall exercise the option provided in Section 1920a of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-1a) to implement a program for accelerated enrollment of children.

(b) The department shall designate the single point of entry, as defined in subdivision (c), as the qualified entity for determining eligibility under this section.

(c) For purposes of this section, “single point of entry” means the centralized processing entity that accepts and screens applications for benefits under the Medi-Cal Program for the purpose of forwarding them to the appropriate counties.

(d) The department shall implement this section only if, and to the extent that, federal financial participation is available.

(e) The department shall seek federal approval of any state plan amendments necessary to implement this section. When federal approval of the state plan amendment or amendments is received, the department shall commence implementation of this section on the first day of the second month following the month in which federal approval of the state plan amendment or amendments is received, or on July 1, 2002, whichever is later.

(f) Notwithstanding
 Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall, without taking any regulatory action, implement this section by means of all-county letters. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(g) Upon the receipt of an application for a child who has coverage pursuant to the accelerated enrollment program, a county shall determine whether the child is eligible for Medi-Cal benefits. If the county determines that the child does not meet the eligibility requirements for participation in the Medi-Cal program, the county shall report this finding to the Medical Eligibility Data System so that accelerated enrollment coverage benefits are discontinued. The information to be reported shall consist of the minimum data elements necessary
 to discontinue that coverage for the child. This subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2002, or the date that the program for accelerated enrollment coverage for children takes effect, whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 188, Sec. 35.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14011.65.

(a) To the extent allowed under federal law and only if federal financial participation is available under Title XXI of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397aa et seq.), the state shall administer the Medi-Cal to Healthy Families Accelerated Enrollment program, to provide any child who meets the criteria set forth in subdivision (b) with temporary health benefits for the period described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), as established under Part 6.2 (commencing with Section 12693) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code.

(b) (1) Any child who meets all of the following requirements, shall be eligible for temporary health benefits under this section:

(A) The child, or
 their parent or guardian, submits an application for the Medi-Cal program directly to the county.

(B) The child’s income, as determined on the basis of the application described in subparagraph (A), is within the income limits established by the Healthy Families Program.

(C) The child is under 19 years of age at the time of the application.

(D) The county determines, on the basis of the application described in subparagraph (A), that the child is eligible for full scope Medi-Cal with a spend down of excess income.

(E) The child is not receiving Medi-Cal benefits at the time that the application is submitted.

(F) The child, or
 their parent or guardian, gives, or has given consent for the application to be shared with the Healthy Families Program for purposes of determining the child’s Healthy Families Program eligibility.

(2) The period of accelerated eligibility provided for under this section begins on the first day of the month that the county finds that the child meets all of the criteria described in paragraph (1) and concludes on the last day of the month that the child either is fully enrolled in, or has been determined ineligible for, the Healthy Families Program.

(3) For any child who meets the requirements for temporary health benefits under this section, the county shall forward to the Healthy Families Program sufficient information from the child’s application to determine eligibility for the Healthy Families Program. To the extent possible,
 submission of that information to the Healthy Families Program shall be accomplished using an electronic process developed for use in the Medi-Cal-to-Healthy Families Bridge Benefits Program. The department shall give the Healthy Families Program a daily electronic file of all children provided temporary health benefits pursuant to this section.

(4) The temporary health benefits provided under this section shall be identical to the benefits provided to children who receive full-scope Medi-Cal benefits without a spend down of excess income and shall only be made available through a Medi-Cal provider.

(c) The department, in consultation with the Managed Risk Medical Insurance
 Board and representatives of the local agencies that administer the Medi-Cal program, consumer advocates, and other stakeholders, shall develop and distribute the policies and procedures, including any all-county letters, necessary to implement this section.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action. Thereafter, the department may adopt regulations, as necessary, to implement this section in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(e) The department shall seek approval of any amendments to the state plan necessary to implement this section, in accordance with
 Title XIX (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) of the Social Security Act. Notwithstanding any other law, only when all necessary federal approvals have been obtained shall this section be implemented.

(f) Under no circumstances shall this section be implemented unless the state has sought and obtained approval of any amendments to its state plan, as described in Section 12693.50 of the Insurance Code, necessary to implement this section and obtain funding under Title XXI of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397aa et seq.) for the provision of benefits provided under this section. Notwithstanding any other law, and only when all necessary federal approvals have been obtained by the state, this section shall be implemented only to the extent federal
 financial participation under Title XXI of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397aa et seq.) is available to fund benefits provided under this section.

(g) The department shall commence implementation of this section on the first day of the third month following the month in which federal approval of the state plan amendment or amendments described in subdivision (f), and subdivision (b) of Section 12693.50 of the Insurance Code is received, or on August 1, 2006, whichever is later.

(h) This section shall cease to be implemented on the date that the director executes a declaration, pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 14011.65, stating that implementation of Section 14011.65a has commenced. Implementation of this section shall resume on the date that Section 14011.65a becomes inoperative, pursuant to subdivision (h) of that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 110.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.   As provided in subdivision (h), this section is not implemented during implementation of Section 14011.65a.)
-------------------------------------------

14011.65a.

(a) To the extent allowed under federal law under Title XIX (42) U.S.C. 1396 et seq.) and Title XXI (42 U.S.C. 1397aa et seq.) of the Social Security Act, and only if federal financial participation is available under Title XXI (42 U.S.C. 1397aa et seq.) of the Social Security Act, the state shall administer the Medi-Cal to Healthy Families Presumptive Eligibility Program, to provide any child who meets the criteria set forth in
 subdivision (b) with presumptive eligibility benefits for the period described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b).

(b) (1) On the basis of an initial screen performed by the county when an application for Medi-Cal or Healthy Families Program eligibility is filed, any child who meets all of the following requirements, shall be eligible for presumptive eligibility benefits under this section:

(A) The child, or his or her parent or guardian, submits an application for the Medi-Cal program or the Healthy Families Program directly to the county.

(B) The child’s income, as screened by the county on the basis of the application described in subparagraph (A), is not within the income levels necessary to establish no share-of-cost Medi-Cal eligibility.

(C) The child’s income, as screened by the county on the basis of the application described in subparagraph (A), is within the income limits established by the Healthy Families Program.

(D) The child is under 19 years of age at the time of the application.

(E) The child is not receiving no-cost Medi-Cal or Healthy Families benefits at the time that the application is submitted.

(2) When the county performs the initial screen and determines that the child meets the criteria described in paragraph (1), the county shall establish presumptive eligibility for Healthy Families for that child. Once presumptive eligibility has been established, the county shall continue to determine child’s eligibility for Medi-Cal on the basis of the filed application.

(3) When the county completes the Medi-Cal eligibility determination process and determines a child ineligible for no-cost Medi-Cal and the child appears to be income eligible for the Healthy Families Program, the county shall find the child presumptively eligible for the Healthy Families Program and comply with the standards set forth in paragraph (5) if either of the following conditions are met:

(A) The county determined the child eligible for Medi-Cal with a share of cost.

(B) The child is not income eligible for a poverty level program and the county did not establish no-cost Medi-Cal eligibility because the child did not complete or failed to pass the resource standard or establish disability or deprivation.

(4) The period of presumptive eligibility provided for under this section begins on the
 first day of the month that the county finds that the child meets all of the criteria described in paragraph (1) or (3), and concludes on the last day of the month of the child’s effective date of coverage in the Healthy Families Program, or determination of ineligibility for the Healthy Families Program.

(5) (A) For any child who meets the requirements for presumptive eligibility benefits under this section, the county shall forward to the Healthy Families Program the child’s application, to determine eligibility for the Healthy Families Program. The submission of the application to the Healthy Families Program shall be accomplished using an electronic format, specified by the department provided that the department has implemented the automated interfaces necessary to accomplish electronic submission of applications from the county to the Healthy Families Program without requiring duplicative data entry by the county. If
 all of the eligibility criteria set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) are established at the time of application, the application to Healthy Families Program shall be forwarded in accordance with the timeframes established by the department.

(B) The department shall give the Healthy Families Program a daily electronic file of all children provided presumptive eligibility benefits pursuant to this section.

(6) The presumptive eligibility benefits provided under this section shall be identical to the benefits provided to children who receive full-scope Medi-Cal benefits without a share of cost and shall only be made available through a Medi-Cal provider.

(c) The department, in consultation with the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board and representatives of the local agencies that administer the Medi-Cal
 program, consumer advocates, and other stakeholders, shall develop and distribute the policies and procedures, including any all-county letters, necessary to implement this section.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action. Thereafter, the department may adopt regulations, as necessary, to implement this section in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(e) The department shall seek approval of any amendments to the state plan necessary to implement this section, in accordance with Title XIX (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) of the Social Security Act.
 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, only when all necessary federal approvals have been obtained shall this section be implemented.

(f) Under no circumstances shall this section be implemented unless the state has sought and obtained approval of any amendments to its state plan, as described in Section 12693.50 of the Insurance Code, necessary to implement this section and obtain funding under Title XXI of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397aa et seq.) for the provision of benefits provided under this section. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and only when all necessary federal approvals have been obtained by the state, this section shall be implemented only to the extent federal financial participation under Title XXI of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397aa et seq.) is available to fund benefits provided under this section.

(g) The department
 shall commence implementation of this section on the first day of the third month following the month in which federal approval of the state plan amendment or amendments described in subdivision (f), and subdivision (b) of Section 12693.50 of the Insurance Code is received, or on August 1, 2007, whichever is later.

(h) Upon implementation of the Medi-Cal to Healthy Families Presumptive Eligibility Program pursuant to this section, the director shall execute a declaration, which shall be retained by the director, stating that implementation of this section has commenced. This section shall become inoperative three years after the date that the director executes the declaration, and shall be repealed on January 1 of the year following the date upon which this section becomes inoperative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 328, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Inoperative on date prescribed in subd. (h).   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14011.65b.

(a) To the extent federal financial participation is available, the department shall exercise the option provided in Section 1920a of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-1a) to implement a program of presumptive eligibility for any child who meets both of the following criteria:

(1) He or she has been receiving, but is no longer eligible for, benefits under the Healthy Families Program.

(2) He
 or she appears to be income-eligible for full-scope Medi-Cal without a share of cost.

(b) The department shall designate the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board or any agent designated by the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board, including, but not limited to, the single point of entry defined in subdivision (c) of Section 14011.6, as the qualified entity for determining eligibility under this section.

(c) The presumptive eligibility benefits provided under this section shall be identical to the benefits provided to children who receive full-scope Medi-Cal benefits without a share of cost, and shall only be made available through a Medi-Cal provider.

(d) The department shall commence implementation of this section on July 1, 2007, or after all necessary federal approvals are obtained, whichever date is later. Upon
 implementation of the presumptive eligibility program described in this section, the Director of Health Care Services shall executive a declaration, which shall be retained by the director, stating that implementation of the program has commenced.

(e) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall, without taking any regulatory action, initially implement this section by means of all-county letters. Thereafter, the department shall adopt any necessary regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(f) Upon the receipt of a timely and complete Medi-Cal application for a child who has coverage pursuant to the presumptive eligibility program authorized under this section, a county shall
 determine whether the child is eligible for Medi-Cal benefits. If the county determines that the child does not meet the eligibility requirements for participation in the Medi-Cal program, the county shall timely report this finding to the Medical Eligibility Data System so that presumptive eligibility benefits are discontinued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 188, Sec. 36.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14011.66.

(a) Effective January 1, 2014, the department shall provide Medi-Cal benefits during a presumptive eligibility period to individuals who have been determined eligible on the basis of preliminary information by a qualified hospital in accordance with Section 1396a(a)(47)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code and as set forth in this section.

(b) A hospital may only make presumptive eligibility determinations under this section if it complies with all of following:

(1) It is a participating provider under the state plan or under a federal waiver under Section 1315 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) It has notified the department in writing that it has elected to be a qualified entity for the purpose of making presumptive eligibility determinations.

(3) It agrees to make presumptive eligibility determinations consistent with all applicable policies and procedures.

(4) It has not been disqualified to make presumptive eligibility determinations by the department.

(c) Qualified hospitals may only make presumptive eligibility determinations based upon income for children, pregnant people, parents and other caretaker relatives, and other adults, whose income is calculated using the applicable MAGI-based income standard or for individuals who are 65 years of
 age or older, blind, or disabled whose income is not calculated using the applicable MAGI-based income standard for which federal approval is obtained pursuant to subdivision (g).

(d) The department shall establish a process for determining whether a hospital should be disqualified from being able to make presumptive eligibility determinations under this section.

(e) For purposes of this section, “MAGI-based income” means income calculated using the financial methodologies described in Section 1396a(e)(14) of Title 42 of the United States Code, as added by the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148) and as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152) and any subsequent amendments.

(f) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time any necessary regulations are adopted. The department shall adopt regulations by July 1, 2017, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Beginning six months after the effective date of this section, and notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, until regulations have been adopted.

(g) This section shall be implemented only if and to the extent that federal financial participation is available and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 372, Sec. 1.   (AB 1481)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14011.7.

(a) To the extent allowed under federal law and only if federal financial participation is available, the department shall exercise the option provided in Section 1396r-1a of Title 42 of the United States Code and the option provided in Section 1397gg(e)(1)(D) of Title 42 of the United States Code to implement a program for preenrollment of children into the Medi-Cal program. Upon the exercise of both of the federal options described in this subdivision, the department shall implement the Children’s Presumptive Eligibility Program for the preenrollment of children into the Medi-Cal program.

(b) (1) Before July 1, 2003, the department shall develop an electronic application to serve as the application for the Children’s Presumptive
 Eligibility Program, to the extent allowed under federal law.
